tr: Hindistan cevizi yağı rafinasyon türü: Sızma; Hafif rafine; RBD; Rafine; Saf; Tam çekirdek; Diğer
pl: Typ rafinacji oleju kokosowego: Extra virgin; Lekko rafinowany; RBD; Rafinowany; Virgin; Tłoczony z całego bielma; Inny
sl-SI: Vrsta rafiniranja kokosovega olja: Ekstra deviško; Rahlo rafinirano; RBD; Rafinirano; Deviško; Iz celih jedrc; Drugo
ja: ココナッツオイルの精製タイプ: エキストラバージン; 低精製; RBD; 精製; バージン; ホールカーネル; その他
fi: Kookosöljyn jalostustyyppi: Extra virgin; Kevyesti puhdistettu; RBD; Puhdistettu; Virgin; Kokonainen ydin; Muu
vi: Loại tinh chế dầu dừa: Siêu nguyên chất (Extra virgin); Tinh chế nhẹ; RBD; Tinh chế; Nguyên chất; Ép từ toàn bộ cơm dừa; Khác
ko: 코코넛 오일 정제 방식: 엑스트라 버진; 약정제; RBD; 정제; 버진; 홀 커널; 기타
da: Type af raffineringsgrad for kokosolie: Ekstra jomfru; Let raffineret; RBD; Raffineret; Jomfru; Hel kerne; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de refinação do óleo de coco: Extravirgem; Levemente refinado; RBD; Refinado; Virgem; Amêndoa integral; Outros
sk-SK: Typ rafinácie kokosového oleja: Extra panenský; Mierne rafinovaný; RBD; Rafinovaný; Panenský; Z celých jadier; Iné
zh-CN: 椰子油精炼类型: 特级初榨; 轻度精炼; RBD; 精炼; 初榨; 全果肉; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de rafinare a uleiului de cocos: Extravirgin; Ușor rafinat; RBD; Rafinat; Virgin; Din miez întreg; Altele
lt-LT: Kokosų aliejaus rafinavimo tipas: Ypač tyras; Švelniai rafinuotas; RBD; Rafinuotas; Tyras; Iš viso branduolio; Kita
nl: Kokosolie raffinagetype: Extra vierge; Licht geraffineerd; RBD; Geraffineerd; Vierge; Hele pit; Overig
nb: Type raffinering av kokosolje: Extra virgin; Lett raffinert; RBD; Raffinert; Virgin; Hel kjerne; Annet
zh-TW: 椰子油精煉類型: 特級初榨; 輕度精煉; RBD; 精煉; 初榨; 全核; 其他
hu: Kókuszolaj finomítási típusa: Extra szűz; Enyhén finomított; RBD; Finomított; Szűz; Teljes mag; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta rafiniranja kokosovog ulja: Ekstradjevičansko; Blago rafinirano; RBD; Rafinirano; Djevičansko; Od cijelog zrna; Ostalo
sv: Typ av förädling av kokosolja: Extra virgin; Lättraffinerad; RBD; Raffinerad; Virgin; Hel kärna; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de refinação do óleo de coco: Virgem extra; Ligeiramente refinado; RBD; Refinado; Virgem; Semente inteira; Outro
ru: Тип обработки кокосового масла: Extra virgin; Легкой очистки; Рафинированное (RBD); Рафинированное; Virgin; Из цельных ядер; Другое
el: Τύπος εξευγενισμού ελαίου καρύδας: Εξαιρετικό παρθένο; Ελαφρώς ραφιναρισμένο; RBD; Ραφιναρισμένο; Παρθένο; Από ολόκληρο τον πυρήνα; Άλλο
cs: Typ rafinace kokosového oleje: Extra panenský; Jemně rafinovaný; RBD; Rafinovaný; Panenský; Z celých jader; Jiný
de: Raffinationsart von Kokosnussöl: Nativ extra; Leicht raffiniert; RBD; Raffiniert; Nativ; Aus dem ganzen Kern; Andere
th: ประเภทการกลั่นน้ำมันมะพร้าว: เอ็กซ์ตร้าเวอร์จิน; ผ่านการกลั่นเล็กน้อย; RBD; ผ่านการกลั่น; เวอร์จิน; สกัดจากทั้งเนื้อและผิวเยื่อบุ; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de refinamiento del aceite de coco: Virgen extra; Ligeramente refinado; RBD; Refinado; Virgen; De grano entero; Otro
en: Coconut oil refinement type: Extra virgin; Lightly refined; RBD; Refined; Virgin; Whole kernel; Other
it: tipo di raffinazione dell'olio di cocco: Extravergine; Leggermente raffinato; RBD; Raffinato; Vergine; Chicco intero; Altro
bg-BG: Тип рафиниране на кокосовото масло: Екстра върджин; Леко рафинирано; Рафинирано, избелено и дезодорирано (RBD); Рафинирано; Върджин; От цели ядки; Други
fr: Type de raffinage de l’huile de coco: Extra vierge; Légèrement raffinée; RBD; Raffinée; Vierge; Noyau entier; Autre